Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5599.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-59 of the General Laws entitled "Council on Postsecondary
Education [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
16-59-29. Corrections education and vocational planning group.
(a) There is established a corrections education and vocational planning group (CEVPG)
to consider opportunities for career and educational programming in the Rhode Island state prison
system, including higher education pathways that have demonstrable benefits including facility
safety, public safety, lower recidivism, self-efficacy, intergenerational improvement, and
employability.
(b) The members of the CEVPG shall be as follows:
(1) The commissioner of the department of corrections, or designee, who shall serve as
chair;
(2) The postsecondary commissioner, or designee;
(3) The director of rehabilitative services, department of corrections;
(4) The director of the department of business regulation, or designee;
(5) The president of the New England Board of Higher Education, or designee;
(6) A formerly incarcerated person, appointed by the director of rehabilitative services,
department of corrections; and
(7) The chairperson of the council on postsecondary education, or designee.

(c) The CEVPG shall consult as necessary with the New England Board of Higher
Education, other New England departments of corrections, service providers, and advocates.
(d) The CEVPG shall consider policies, implementation strategies, and funding needs,
including, but not limited to:
(1) Strategic planning for educational challenges and opportunities;
(2) Sustainable partnerships with Rhode Island institutions of higher education for the
delivery of courses and programs;
(3) Credit transfer compacts to ensure higher education institution acceptance of credits
earned before and during incarceration, including strategies for completion of degree programs
after release from incarceration;
(4) College readiness programs; and
(5) Coordination with cross-facility and cross-state programs and the New England Board
of Higher Education to expand availability of offerings.
(e) The CEVPG shall:
(1) Assess labor market needs and in-demand skills and credentials for alignment of
postsecondary education in prison;
(2) Inventory the department of corrections facility needs, including space, staffing, and
access to technology and computer equipment, within safety protocols;
(3) Assess opportunities for work-based learning and apprenticeships;
(4) Identify barriers to continuity of academic programs, support, campus access upon
release, and consider the establishment of reentry navigators at participating higher education
institutions;
(5) Examine ways to prioritize postsecondary and career pathways in the intake and
classification processes, and the use of education and career navigators;
(6) Examine the supplementation of Pell Grant funding by Rhode Island institutions of
higher education for Pell Grant-eligible, formerly incarcerated persons; and
(7) Consider state budgetary needs, sources of federal funding in addition to Second
Chance Pell Grants, and grant funding regarding implementation and planning for new and existing
educational opportunities, especially in coordination with the New England Board of Higher
Education and other departments of correction in New England.
(f) The CEVPG shall file annual reports on group progress and recommendations
beginning on December 1, 2025, with all organizations listed in subsection (b) of this section, as
well as with the governor, the president of the senate, and the speaker of the house of
representatives.
LC002110 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC002110
========
LC002110 - Page 3 of 4